Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2768XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 321 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13D Limitation on expenditure 1 of certain public moneys for high school organizations ââ school 2 classifications. 3 1. For the purposes of this section: 4 a. âExtracurricular interscholastic activityâ means a contest 5 or competition for sports between different schools and outside 6 the regular scope of a schoolâs curriculum. 7 b. âOrganizationâ means a corporation, association, 8 or organization which has as one of its primary purposes 9 the sponsoring or administration of an extracurricular 10 interscholastic activity, but does not include an agency of 11 this state, a public or private school or school board, or an 12 athletic conference or other association whose interscholastic 13 contests or competitions do not include more than twenty-four 14 schools. 15 2. On or after January 1, 2027, a school district or a 16 charter school shall not expend any moneys, and an accredited 17 or unaccredited nonpublic school shall not expend any moneys 18 originating from the state, to pay dues or membership fees 19 to an organization, and the school shall not be a member of, 20 participate in activities associated with, or receive services 21 from an organization unless the organization, for each school 22 year beginning on or after July 1, 2026, classifies, for the 23 purposes of an extracurricular interscholastic activity, each 24 school participating in an extracurricular interscholastic 25 activity based on the schoolâs enrollment, provided that the 26 enrollment number for nonpublic schools shall be adjusted 27 pursuant to subsection 3. 28 3. a. Prior to the beginning of a school calendar, each 29 nonpublic school shall provide an organization with the 30 schoolâs number of enrolled students. When determining a 31 schoolâs classification, an organization shall adjust the 32 enrollment number of a nonpublic school that accepts payment 33 from an education savings account established pursuant to 34 section 257.11B for the same school year, by multiplying the 35 -1- LSB 2768XS (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 321 number of the nonpublic schoolâs enrolled students by one and 1 one-half. 2 b. The adjustment made pursuant to this subsection shall 3 not cause the nonpublic school to be placed in a classification 4 that is more than one greater than the classification the 5 nonpublic school would have received without the enrollment 6 adjustment. 7 4. This section shall not apply to eight-person football. 8 Sec. 2. SCHOOL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025. An organization 9 may classify schools according to the methodology described 10 in section 1 of this Act for the school year beginning July 11 1, 2025, and school districts, charter schools, and nonpublic 12 schools may expend moneys to pay dues or membership fees to an 13 organization that does so. 14